Rhode Island statutes. Title 4 Animals and Animal Husbandry
Chapter 11 Psittacine Birds

4-11-1.
Birds subject to chapter.

Psittacine birds as referred to in this chapter include all birds known as parrots, Amazons, Mexican double heads, African grays, cockatoos, macaws, parakeets, love birds, lories, lorikeets, and all other birds of the psittacine family.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-1

.

4-11-2.
Importation permits.

No psittacine birds shall be shipped into Rhode Island unless a permit is obtained from the director of environmental management prior to shipment.

Permits shall be issued only if a request for one is accompanied by a certificate issued by a graduate, licensed veterinarian certifying that all birds on the premises from which the shipment originates are free from any symptoms of any infectious, contagious or communicable disease.

Requests for permits to import psittacine birds must contain the number and kind of bird to be imported, origin and date of shipment, and destination of shipment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-2

.

4-11-3.
Records to be kept by dealers.

Persons who import, purchase, breed, sell, exchange, barter, give away, or otherwise deal in psittacine birds shall keep records of each bird consisting of the following data:

Breeder’s name and address;

Identifying band number;

Species of bird;

Date of transfer to new owner; and

Name and address of new owner.

These records shall be kept for a minimum period of two (2) years and be subject to inspection by the local health officer or a representative of the state department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-3

.

4-11-4.
Banding of birds imported, sold, or given.

All psittacine birds imported, purchased, sold, exchanged, bartered, or given away must be closed metal seamless banded with a band identifying the breeder by whom they were bred. A microchip may be used in lieu of an identifying band.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-4

; P.L. 2012, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 95, § 1.

4-11-5.
Banding of breeding stock.

All psittacine breeding stock must be closed metal seamless banded by January 1, 1960.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-5

.

4-11-6.
Notice of intent to breed birds.

Each person intending to breed psittacine birds shall file written notification of that intent with the local health officer and the state department of environmental management before engaging in that procedure annually each January first.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-6

.

4-11-7.
Treatment of birds exposed to psittacosis.

If laboratory examination confirms infection with the agent that causes psittacosis, the remaining birds shall be humanely euthanized or treated according to the most current, “Compendium Of Measures To Control Chlamydophila Psittaci Infection Among Humans (Psittacosis) And Pet Birds (Avian Chlamydiosis),” as reviewed by the National Association of State Public Health Veterinarians, (NASPHV). The director, or the director’s designee, shall oversee such treatment which shall be administered at the bird owner’s expense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-7

; P.L. 2012, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 95, § 1.

4-11-8.
Notice of unusual illness or deaths.

It is the duty of any person having the custody or care of any birds of the psittacine family to notify the local health officer and the state department of environmental management immediately regarding any unusual illness or death among those birds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-8

.

4-11-9.
Quarantine and destruction of nonpsittacine birds exposed to psittacosis.

Birds not of the psittacine family are to be regarded as dangerous when they have been exposed to psittacosis, and after that exposure shall be quarantined for three (3) weeks and killed and burned by the owner or other person in charge of those birds if they develop or appear to develop symptoms of the disease.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-9

.

4-11-10.
Indemnity for destroyed birds denied.

No indemnity will be paid the owner or other person in charge of those birds for destroyed birds.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-10

.

4-11-11.
Enforcement of chapter — Rules and regulations.

The director of environmental management in cooperation with the local health officers shall carry out the provisions of this chapter. The director of environmental management is authorized to make reasonable rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-11

.

4-11-12.
Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation who violates any provision of this chapter shall be subject upon conviction to a fine not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) per bird and/or loss of specimen.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 12; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-12

; P.L. 1994, ch. 231, § 1.

4-11-13.
Other laws unimpaired.

No parts of this chapter shall, or are intended to, nullify any of the provisions of chapters 4 — 6 of this title or chapter 25 of title 5.

History of Section.

P.L. 1955, ch. 3557, § 13; G.L. 1956, §

4-11-13

.